Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-676
Acquisition; operation; bonds; issuance; amount; approval of electors required.

Where the amount of money which would be raised by the tax levy provided for in section 16-675 would be insufficient to establish or pay for a system of waterworks, gas, electric, or other light works, or heating or power system, the mayor and city council may borrow money and pledge the property and credit of the city upon its negotiable bonds or otherwise to an amount not exceeding two hundred and fifty thousand dollars for the purpose of establishing, constructing, extending, enlarging or paying for, or maintaining the utilities named in this section; Provided, that no such bonds shall be issued by the city council until the question of issuing the same shall have been submitted to the electors of the city at an election held for such purpose, notice of which shall have been given by publication once each week for three successive weeks prior thereto in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in such city, and a majority of the electors voting upon the proposition shall have voted in favor of issuing such bonds. However, no election shall be called until a petition signed by at least fifty resident freeholders shall be presented to the mayor and council asking that an election be called for the purpose herein specified.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 54, p. 272;

Laws 1905, c. 23, § 2, p. 244;

Laws 1907, c. 14, § 1, p. 122;

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 185;

R.S.1913, § 4954;

Laws 1917, c. 97, § 1, p. 261;

Laws 1919, c. 38, § 1, p. 121;

Laws 1921, c. 169, § 1, p. 662;

C.S.1922, § 4123;

C.S.1929, § 16-652;

Laws 1931, c. 29, § 1, p. 118;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-652;

R.S.1943, § 16-676;

Laws 1951, c. 26, § 3, p. 118.